California statutes. Public Resources Code
(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1264, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

32108.

The authority may, out of any funds available therefor, purchase its bonds or notes. The authority may hold, pledge, cancel, or resell the bonds, subject to and in accordance with agreements with bondholders.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1264, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

32109.

In the discretion of the authority, any bonds issued under this division may be secured by a trust agreement by and between the authority and a corporate trustee or trustees, which may be the Treasurer or any trust company or bank having the powers of a trust company within or without the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1264, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

32110.

(a) The trust agreement or the resolution providing for the issuance of the bonds may pledge or assign the revenues to be received or proceeds of any contract or contracts pledge and may convey or mortgage the project or projects, or any portion thereof, to be financed out of the proceeds of the bonds. The trust agreement or resolution providing for the issuance of the bonds may contain the provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights and remedies of the bondholders as may be reasonable and proper and not in violation of law, including particularly provisions specifically authorized to be included in any resolution or resolutions of the authority authorizing bonds thereof.

(b) Any bank or trust company doing business under the laws of this state which may act as depository of the proceeds of bonds or of revenues or other moneys may furnish indemnifying bonds or pledge securities as may be required by the authority.

(c) The trust agreement may set forth the rights and remedies of the bondholders and of the trustee or trustees, and may restrict the individual right of action by bondholders. In addition, any trust agreement or resolution may contain other provisions that the authority may deem reasonable and proper for the security of the bondholders.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1264, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

32111.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Treasurer shall not be deemed to have a conflict of interest by reason of acting as trustee pursuant to this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1264, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

32112.

All expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of this trust agreement or resolution may be treated as a part of the cost of the operation of a project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1264, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

32113.

Bonds issued under this division do not constitute a debt or liability of the state or of any political subdivision thereof, other than the authority, or a pledge of the full faith and credit of the state or any of its political subdivisions, other than the authority, but are payable solely from the funds provided therefor under this division. All the bonds shall contain on the face thereof a statement to the following effect:

“Neither the full faith and credit nor the taxing power of the State of California is pledged to the payment of the principal of or interest on this bond.” 

The issuance of bonds under this division shall not directly or indirectly or contingently obligate the state or any political subdivision thereof to levy or to pledge any form of taxation whatever therefor or to make any appropriation for their payment. Nothing in this section shall prevent, or be construed to prevent, the authority from pledging its full faith and credit to the payment of bonds or issue of bonds authorized pursuant to this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1264, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

32114.

(a) The authority may provide for the issuance of bonds of the authority for the purpose of refunding any bonds, notes, or other securities of the authority then outstanding, including the payment of any redemption premium thereon and any interest accrued or to accrue to the earliest or subsequent date of redemption, purchase, or maturity of these bonds and, if deemed advisable by the authority, for the additional purpose of paying all or any part of the cost of constructing and acquiring additions, improvements, extensions, or enlargements of an urban waterfront restoration project or any portion thereof.

(b) The proceeds of any bonds issued for the purpose of refunding outstanding bonds, notes, or other securities may, in the discretion of the authority, be applied to the purchase or retirement at maturity or redemption of these outstanding bonds either on their earliest or any subsequent redemption date or upon the purchase or retirement at the maturity thereof and may, pending the application, be placed in escrow to be applied to the purchase or retirement at maturity or redemption on the date as may be determined by the authority.

(c) Pending this use, the escrowed proceeds may be invested and reinvested by the Treasurer in obligations of, or guaranteed by, the United States of America, or in certificates of deposit or time deposits secured by obligations of, or guaranteed by, the United States of America, maturing at time or times appropriate to assure the prompt payment, as to principal, interest, and redemption premium, if any, of the outstanding bonds to be so refunded. The interest, income, and profits, if any, earned or realized on the investment may also be applied to the payment of the outstanding bonds to be so refunded. After the terms of the escrow have been fully satisfied and carried out, any balance of the proceeds and interest, income, and profits, if any earned or realized on the investments thereof, shall be returned to the authority and the conservancy for use in carrying out this division.

(d) The portion of the proceeds of the bonds issued for the additional purpose of paying all or any part of the cost of constructing and acquiring additions, improvements, extensions, or enlargements of an urban waterfront restoration project may be invested and reinvested by the Treasurer in obligations of, or guaranteed by, the United States of America, or in certificates of deposit or time deposits secured by obligations of, or guaranteed by, the United States of America, maturing not later than the time or times when these proceeds will be needed for the purpose of paying all or any part of the cost. The interest, income and profits, if any earned or realized on this investment, may be applied to the payment of all or any part of the cost or may be used by the authority and the conservancy in carrying out this division.

(e) All these bonds are subject to this division in the same manner and to the same extent as other bonds issued pursuant to the provisions of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1264, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

32115.

Bonds issued by the authority are legal investments for all trust funds, the funds of all insurance companies, banks, both commercial and savings, trust companies, savings and loan associations, and investment companies, for executors, administrators, trustees, and other fiduciaries, for state school funds, and for any funds which may be invested in county, municipal, or school district bonds, and these bonds are securities which may properly and legally be deposited with, and received by, any state or municipal officer or agency or political subdivision of the state for any purpose for which the deposit of bonds or obligations of the state, is now, or may hereafter be, authorized by law, including deposits to secure public funds if, and only to the extent that, evidence of indebtedness or debt securities of the participating party receiving financing through the issuance of these bonds which qualify or are eligible for these purposes and uses.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1264, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

32116.

No liability shall be incurred by the authority beyond the extent to which moneys have been provided under this division, except that, for the purposes of meeting the necessary expenses of initial organization and operation until the date that the authority derives revenues or proceeds from bonds or notes as provided under this division, the authority may borrow money as needed for these expenses from the General Fund in the State Treasury. The borrowed money shall be repaid with interest within a reasonable time after the authority receives revenues or proceeds from bonds or notes as provided under this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1264, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Supplemental Bond Provisions [32150. - 32154.]

32150.

The authority is not required to pay any property taxes or assessments upon, or with respect to, an urban waterfront restoration project or any property acquired by or for the authority under this division or upon the income therefrom, so long as the authority holds title to the project or to the property or facilities comprised in the project.

The exemption of the authority from taxation of any project ceases when title to the property is transferred from the authority to any normally taxable participating party. This section does not exempt any normally taxable participating party from taxation, including, but not limited to, taxation upon a possessory interest, with respect to any project, or the property or facilities comprised in any project, which may otherwise be applicable to the participating party.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1264, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

32151.

Subject to Section 32153, the existence of the authority may be terminated by statute at any time by the Legislature. Upon dissolution of the authority, the title to all properties owned by it shall, subject to the interests of any participating parties therein, vest in and become the property of the State of California and shall not inure to the benefit of any private party.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1264, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

32152.

This division provides a complete, additional, and alternative method for the doing of the things authorized thereby, and shall be regarded as supplemental and additional to powers conferred by other laws, except that the issuance of bonds and refunding bonds under this division need not comply with the requirements of any other law applicable to the issuance of bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1264, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

32153.

The State of California does hereby pledge to, and agree with, the holders of any obligations issued under this division, and with those parties who may enter into contracts with the authority pursuant to this division, that the state will not limit or alter the rights hereby vested in the authority to finance any project and to fulfill the terms of any loan agreement, lease, or other contract with the authority pursuant to this division, or in any way impair the rights or remedies of the bonds or the parties until those obligations, together with the interest thereon, are fully met and discharged and those contracts are fully performed on the part of the authority. However, nothing in this section precludes this limitation or alteration if and when adequate provision has been made by law for the protection of the holders of those obligations of the authority or those entering into those contracts with the authority. The authority, as agent for the state, is authorized to include this pledge and undertaking for the state in its obligations or contracts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1264, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

32154.

The powers granted to the authority by this division may be exercised without regard or reference to any department or agency of the state. All other general or special laws, or parts thereof, inconsistent with this division are hereby declared to be inapplicable to the provisions of this division. Nothing in this division shall be interpreted to exempt the construction or acquisition of any urban waterfront restoration project by any participating party from compliance with all applicable local, state, or federal laws and regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1264, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Construction and Leases of Facilities [32200. - 32208.]

32200.

The authority may contract with any participating party for the construction of an urban waterfront restoration project by the participating party. All contracts for the construction of a project by a participating party shall provide that the participating party is responsible for the architectural and engineering design and for the construction and completion thereof, subject to the standards for architectural and engineering design as may be established, and subject to the supervision, as the conservancy and the authority deem necessary.

The authority may agree to pay the cost of the project constructed by any participating party and to advance the costs from time to time in installments or otherwise as required by the contract for the construction thereof. Title to all projects shall be vested in the authority, subject to the terms of any lease thereof to the participating party or the rights of a participating party under any contract for the purchase of the project, including the payment of the purchase price under installment sales contracts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1264, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

32201.

The authority may, as lessor or lessee, enter into leases and agreements with any participating party relating to the acquisition, construction, and installation of any project, including real property, buildings, machinery, furnishings, equipment, and urban waterfront restoration facilities of any kind or character. The terms and conditions of these leases may be as mutually agreed upon. The lease may provide the means or methods by which title shall vest in a participating party upon the termination of the lease and shall contain other terms and conditions that the authority may determine.

The authority may fix, revise, charge, and collect rates, rents, fees, and charges for each project. These rates, rents, fees, and charges shall be fixed and adjusted with respect to the aggregate of rates, rents, fees, and charges from all projects so as to provide funds sufficient with other revenues and moneys available therefor, if any, to do all of the following:

(a) Pay the principal of, and the interest on, outstanding bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness of the authority issued with respect to the urban waterfront restoration project that become due and payable.

(b) Create and maintain reserves required or provided for in any resolution authorizing, or trust agreement securing, the bonds. A sufficient amount of the revenues derived from a project may be set aside at regular intervals as may be provided in the resolution or trust agreement in a sinking or other similar fund which is hereby pledged to, and charged with, the payment of the principal of and interest on these bonds as they become due, and the redemption price or the purchase price of bonds retired by call or purchase as provided therein. The pledge shall be valid and binding from the time the pledge is made; the rates, rents, fees, and charges and other revenues or other moneys so pledged and thereafter received by the authority shall immediately be subject to the lien of this pledge without any physical delivery thereof or further act, and the lien of this pledge shall be valid and binding as against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract, or otherwise against the authority, regardless of whether the parties have notice thereof. The resolution or any trust agreement or any other agreement or any lease by which a pledge is created need not be filed or recorded except in the records of the authority. The use and disposition of moneys to the credit of the sinking or other similar fund shall be subject to the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds or of the trust agreement. Except as may otherwise be provided in the resolution or the trust agreement, the sinking or other similar fund may be a fund for all bonds of the authority issued to finance projects of a particular participating party without distinction or priority of one over another. However, the authority, in any resolution or trust agreement, may provide that the sinking or other similar fund shall be the fund for a particular project or projects and for the bonds issued to finance a particular project or projects and may, additionally, permit and provide for the issuance of bonds having a subordinate lien with respect to the security authorized for other bonds of the authority, and, in such case, the authority may create separate sinking or other similar funds with respect to the subordinate lien bonds. 

(c) Pay the operating and administrative costs of the authority, and the operating and administrative expenses of the conservancy in carrying out its responsibilities under this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1264, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

32202.

The authority may enter into contracts of sale with any participating party covering any urban waterfront restoration project financed by the authority. The purchase price pursuant to the contract of sale shall be treated in substantially the same manner and shall be at least sufficient to provide funds for all the purposes specified in Section 32201 and may be paid in installments, together with interest on the unpaid balance, or otherwise, as may be mutually agreed and set forth in the contract of sale.

All payments received by the authority under any installment sales or conditional sales contract shall be applied by the authority substantially in the same manner as in Section 32201 in the case of lease payments or rental charges received by the authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1264, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

32203.

As an alternative to leasing or selling an urban waterfront restoration project to a participating party, the authority may finance the acquisition, construction, or installation of a project by means of a loan to the participating party.

The principal amount of the participating party’s obligation, as borrower, shall be sufficient to provide funds for all the purposes specified in subdivisions (a), (b), and (c) of Section 32201 and may be paid in installments, together with interest on the unpaid balance, or otherwise as may be mutually agreed by the authority and the participating party and set forth in the loan agreement. Loans made pursuant to this section may be secured or unsecured, in the discretion of the authority.

Section 32200 is not applicable to projects constructed with money loaned pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1264, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

32204.

All moneys received pursuant to this division, whether as proceeds from the sale of bonds, notes, or other evidence of indebtedness or as revenues, are trust funds to be held and applied solely as provided in this division.

Any bank or trust company with which the moneys are deposited shall act as trustee of these moneys and shall hold and apply them for the purposes of this division, subject to the resolution authorizing the bonds of any issue or the trust agreements securing the bonds provide.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1264, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

32205.

Any holder of bonds, notes, or other obligations issued under this division or any of the coupons appertaining thereto, and the trustee or trustees under any trust agreement, except to the extent the rights herein given which may be restricted by any resolution authorizing the issuance of, or the trust agreement securing, the bonds, notes, or other obligations, may, either at law or in equity, by suit, action, mandamus, or other proceedings, protect and enforce any and all rights under the laws of the state or granted hereunder or under the resolution or trust agreements, and may enforce and compel the performance of all duties required by this division or by the resolution or trust agreement to be performed by the authority or by any officer, employee, or agent thereof, including the fixing, charging, and collecting of the rates, rents, fees, and charges authorized by this division and required by the resolution or trust agreement to be fixed, established, and collected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1264, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

32206.

The exercise of the powers granted by this division shall be in all respects for the benefit of the people of this state, for their health and welfare, and protection of the state’s environment.

Any bonds, notes, or other obligations issued under this division, their transfer and the income therefrom, shall at all times be free from taxation of every kind by the state and by municipalities and other political subdivisions of the state. However, the preceding sentence shall not apply with respect to any bonds, notes, or other obligations, or the income therefrom, for any period during which the bonds, notes, or other obligations are held by (1) Any normally taxable participating party, (2) persons, organizations, trades, or business, whether incorporated, organized in this state, or affiliated with a participating party, owned or controlled, directly or indirectly, by the participating party, or (3) persons, organizations, trades, or businesses, whether incorporated, organized in this state, or affiliated with the participating party, which own or control, directly or indirectly, the participating party.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1264, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

32207.

If the jurisdiction of the authority to order a proposed act is not affected, an omission of any officer or of the authority in the proceedings under this division or any other defect in the proceedings does not invalidate the proceedings for issuance of bonds pursuant to this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1264, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

32208.

An action may be brought pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 860) of Title 10 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure to determine the validity of any issuance or proposed issuance of bonds under this division and the legality and validity of all proceedings previously taken or proposed in a resolution of the authority to be taken for the authorization, issuance, sale, and delivery of the bonds and for the payment of the principal thereof and interest thereon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1264, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 22.3. SACRAMENTO-SAN JOAQUIN DELTA CONSERVANCY  [32300. - 32381.]



CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [32300. - 32301.]

32300.

This division shall be known, and may be cited, as the Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta Conservancy Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 37.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

32301.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) The Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta is a unique natural resource of local, state, and national significance.

(b) At 1,300 square miles, the Delta is the largest estuary on the west coast of North and South America.

(c) Its rivers and labyrinths of sloughs and channels are home to 750 species of plants and wildlife as well as 55 species of fish, provide habitat for 700 native plant and animal species, and are part of the Pacific Flyway.

(d) The Delta contains more than
 500,000 acres of agricultural land, with unique soils, and farmers who are creative and utilize innovative agriculture, such as carbon sequestration crops, subsidence reversal crops, wildlife-friendly crops, and crops direct for marketing to the large urban populations nearby.

(e) The Delta and Suisun Marsh provide numerous opportunities for recreation, such as boating, kayaking, fishing, hiking, birding, and hunting. Navigable waterways in the Delta are available for public access and currently make up the majority of recreational opportunities. There is a need for land-based recreational access points including parks, picnic areas, and campgrounds.

(f) The Delta’s history is rich with a distinct natural, agricultural, and cultural heritage. It is home to the community of Locke, the only town in the United States built primarily by early Chinese immigrants. Other legacy
 communities include Bethel Island, Clarksburg, Courtland, Freeport, Hood, Isleton, Knightsen, Rio Vista, Ryde, and Walnut Grove.

(g) The Delta is home to more than 500,000 people and 200,000 jobs, and contributes over thirty-five billion dollars ($35,000,000,000) to the state’s economy.

(h) In addition, the Delta provides water to more than 25 million Californians and three million acres of agricultural land. It supports a four hundred billion dollar ($400,000,000,000) economy and is traversed by energy, communications, and transportation facilities vital to the economic health of California.

(i) A Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta Conservancy can support efforts that advance both environmental protection and the economic well-being of Delta residents in a complementary manner, including all of the following:

(1) Protect and enhance habitat and habitat restoration.

(2) Protect and preserve Delta agriculture and working landscapes.

(3) Provide increased opportunities for tourism and recreation.

(4) Promote Delta legacy communities and economic vitality in the Delta in coordination with the Delta Protection Commission.

(5) Increase the resilience of the Delta to the effects of natural disasters such as floods and earthquakes, in coordination with the Delta Protection Commission.

(6) Protect and improve water quality.

(7) Assist the Delta regional economy through the
 operation of the conservancy’s program.

(8) Identify priority projects and initiatives for which funding is needed.

(9) Protect, conserve, and restore the region’s physical, agricultural, cultural, historical, and living resources.

(10) Assist local entities in the implementation of their habitat conservation plans (HCPs) and natural community conservation plans (NCCPs).

(11) Facilitate take protection and safe harbor agreements under the federal Endangered Species Act of 1973 (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1531 et seq.) and the California Endangered Species Act (Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 2050) of Division 3 of the Fish and Game Code) for adjacent landowners and local public agencies.

(12) Promote environmental education.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 37.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Definitions [32310. - 32310.]

32310.

For the purposes of this division, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Board” means the governing board of the Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta Conservancy.

(b) “Conservancy” means the Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta Conservancy.

(c) “Delta” means the Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta as defined in Section 12220 of the Water Code.

(d) “Fund” means the Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta Conservancy Fund created pursuant to Section 32360.

(e) “Local public agency”
 means a city, county, special district, or joint powers authority.

(f) “Nonprofit organization” means a private, nonprofit organization that qualifies for exempt status under Section 501(c)(3) of Title 26 of the United States Code and that has among its principal charitable purposes preservation of land for scientific, recreational, scenic, or open-space opportunities, protection of the natural environment, preservation or enhancement of wildlife, preservation of cultural and historical resources, or efforts to provide for the enjoyment of public lands.

(g) “Suisun Marsh” means the area defined in Section 29101 and protected by Division 19 (commencing with Section 29000).

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 37.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta Conservancy [32320. - 32322.]

32320.

There is in the Natural Resources Agency the Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta Conservancy, which is created as a state agency to work in collaboration and cooperation with local governments and interested parties.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 37.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

32322.

(a) The conservancy shall act as a primary state agency to implement ecosystem restoration in the Delta.

(b) The conservancy shall support efforts that advance environmental protection and the economic well-being of Delta residents, including all of the following:

(1) Protect and enhance habitat and habitat restoration.

(2) Protect and preserve Delta agriculture and working landscapes.

(3) Provide increased opportunities for tourism and recreation in the Delta.

(4) Promote Delta legacy communities and economic vitality in the Delta, in coordination with the Delta Protection Commission.

(5) Increase the resilience of the Delta to the effects of natural disasters such as floods and earthquakes, in coordination with the Delta Protection Commission.

(6) Protect and improve water quality.

(7) Assist the Delta regional economy through the operation of the conservancy’s program.

(8) Identify priority projects and initiatives for which funding is needed.

(9) Protect, conserve, and restore the region’s physical, agricultural, cultural, historical, and living resources.

(10) Assist local entities in the implementation of their habitat conservation plans (HCPs) and natural community conservation plans (NCCPs).

(11) Facilitate take protection and safe harbor agreements under the federal Endangered Species Act of 1973 (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1531 et seq.), the California Endangered Species Act (Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 2050) of Division 3 of the Fish and Game Code), and the Natural Community Conservation Planning Act (Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 2800) of Division 3 of the Fish and Game Code) for adjacent landowners and local public agencies.

(12) Promote environmental education through grant funding.

(c) When implementing subdivision (b), the conservancy shall undertake efforts to enhance public use and enjoyment
 of lands owned by the public.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 37.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Governing Board [32330. - 32350.]

32330.

The board shall consist of 11 voting members and two nonvoting members, appointed or designated as follows:

(a) The 11 voting members of the board shall consist of all of the following:

(1) The Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency, or his or her designee.

(2) The Director of Finance, or his or her designee.

(3) One member of the board or a designee who is appointed by the Contra Costa County Board of Supervisors, who is a resident of that county.

(4) One member of the board or a
 designee who is appointed by the Sacramento County Board of Supervisors, who is a resident of that county.

(5) One member of the board or a designee who is appointed by the San Joaquin County Board of Supervisors, who is a resident of that county.

(6) One member of the board or a designee who is appointed by the Solano County Board of Supervisors, who is a resident of that county.

(7) One member of the board or a designee who is appointed by the Yolo County Board of Supervisors, who is a resident of that county.

(8) Two public members appointed by the Governor, subject to confirmation by the Senate.

(9) One public member appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules.

(10) One public member appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly.

(b) The two nonvoting members shall consist of a Member of the Senate, appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules, and a Member of the Assembly, appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly. The members appointed under this subdivision shall meet with the conservancy and participate in its activities to the extent that this participation is not incompatible with their positions as Members of the Legislature. The appointed members shall represent a district that encompasses a portion of the Delta.

(c) Ten liaison advisers who shall serve in an advisory, nonvoting capacity shall consist of all of the following:

(1) One representative of the United States Fish and Wildlife Service, designated by the
 United States Secretary of the Interior.

(2) One representative of the United States National Marine Fisheries Service, designated by the United States Secretary of Commerce.

(3) One representative of the United States Bureau of Reclamation, designated by the United States Secretary of the Interior.

(4) One representative of the United States Army Corps of Engineers, designated by the Commanding Officer, United States Army Corps of Engineers, South Pacific Division.

(5) A designee of the San Francisco Bay Conservation and Development Commission for coordination purposes.

(6) A designee of the State Coastal Conservancy for coordination purposes.

(7) A designee of the Suisun Resource Conservation District for coordination purposes.

(8) A designee of the Central Valley Flood Protection Board.

(9) A designee of the Yolo Basin Foundation.

(10) A designee of the Delta Protection Commission.

(d) The public members appointed by the Governor shall serve for a term of four years, with a two-term limit.

(e) The locally appointed members and alternates shall serve at the pleasure of the appointing board of supervisors.

(f) The public members appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules or the Speaker of the Assembly shall
 serve for a term of four years, with a two-term limit.

(g) The Members of the Senate and Assembly shall serve at the pleasure of the appointing body.

(h) Alternates for members appointed pursuant to paragraphs (3) to (7), inclusive, of subdivision (a) may be appointed by the respective county boards of supervisors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 296, Sec. 264.   (AB 1023)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

32332.

Annually, the voting members of the board shall elect from among the voting members a chairperson and vice chairperson, and other officers as necessary. If the office of the chairperson or vice chairperson becomes vacant, a new chairperson or vice chairperson shall be elected by the voting members of the board to serve for the remainder of the term. The chairperson shall be selected from among the members specified in paragraphs (3) to (7), inclusive, of subdivision (a) of Section 32330.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 37.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

32334.

A majority of the voting members shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of the business of the conservancy. The board shall not transact the business of the conservancy if a quorum is not present at the time a vote is taken. A decision of the board requires an affirmative vote of six of the voting membership, and the vote is binding with respect to all matters acted on by the conservancy.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 37.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

32336.

The board shall adopt rules and procedures for the conduct of business by the conservancy.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 37.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

32338.

The board may establish advisory boards or committees, hold community meetings, and engage in public outreach.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 37.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

32340.

The board shall establish and maintain a headquarters office within the Delta. The conservancy may rent or own real and personal property and equipment pursuant to applicable statutes and regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 37.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

32342.

The board shall determine the qualifications of, and shall appoint, an executive officer of the conservancy, who shall be exempt from civil service. The board shall employ other staff as necessary to execute the powers and functions provided for in this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 37.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

32344.

The board may enter into contracts with private entities and public agencies to procure consulting and other services necessary to achieve the purposes of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 37.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

32346.

The conservancy’s expenses for support and administration may be paid from the conservancy’s operating budget and any other funding sources available to the conservancy.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 37.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

32348.

The board shall conduct business in accordance with the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 37.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

32350.

The board shall hold its regular meetings within the Delta or the City of Rio Vista.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 37.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Powers, Duties, and Limitations [32360. - 32381.]

32360.

(a) Except as specified in Section 32360.5, the jurisdiction and activities of the conservancy are limited to the Delta and Suisun Marsh.

(b) (1) The Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta Conservancy Fund is hereby created in the State Treasury. Moneys in the fund shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, only for the purposes of this division.

(2) Funds provided for ecosystem restoration and enhancement shall be available for ecosystem restoration projects consistent with the conservancy’s strategic plan adopted pursuant to Section 32376.

(3) Funds may be allocated to a separate program within the conservancy for economic sustainability in the Delta. The economic sustainability plan adopted pursuant to Section 29759 shall be the basis for the program. Funds provided to the conservancy to implement ecosystem restoration projects pursuant to the Bay Delta Conservation Plan shall only be used for ecosystem restoration purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 37.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

32360.5.
